Maryland, session 2025, HB0427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
2–311.
(a) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CERTIFIED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANT WHO IS ON EMERITUS STATUS UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) Unless a license is renewed for a 2–year term as provided in this
section, the license expires on the first December 31 that comes:
[(1)] (I) after the effective date of the license; and
[(2)] (II) in an even–numbered year.
2–313.1.
– 1 –

Ch. 404 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THE BOARD MAY PLACE A LICENSEE ON EMERITUS STATUS, IF THE
LICENSEE SUBMITS TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FOR EMERITUS STATUS ON THE
FORM REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL PLACE A LICENSEE ON EMERITUS STATUS IF THE
INDIVIDUAL:
(1) HAS AN ACTIVE OR INACTIVE LICENSE TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED
PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IS NOT UNDER INVESTIGATION BY THE BOARD FOR A VIOLATION
OF THIS TITLE;
(3) IS NOT THE SUBJECT OF A PENDING DISCIPLINARY ACTION
RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE OR
ANOTHER STATE;
(4) (I) 1. HAS PRACTICED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY IN THE
STATE FOR AT LEAST 20 YEARS; AND
2. IS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD; OR
(II) HAS AT LEAST 40 YEARS OF EXPERIENCE AS A CERTIFIED
PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT; AND
(5) ATTESTS THAT:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL IS RETIRED AND IS NO LONGER ACTIVELY
PRACTICING PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE; AND
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL WILL NOT PROVIDE CERTIFIED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANCY SERVICES UNLESS REINSTATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–314 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL REVIEW AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS
SECTION WITHIN 60 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION.
(D) IF THE BOARD APPROVES AN APPLICATION FOR EMERITUS STATUS
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL SEND THE LICENSEE:
(1) WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE APPROVAL; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 404
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF EMERITUS STATUS.
(E) A LICENSEE ON EMERITUS STATUS IS EXEMPT FROM:
(1) THE CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 2–312 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) THE REINSTATEMENT FEE UNDER § 2–341 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2–314.
In accordance with its regulations, the Board may reinstate the license of an
individual who has failed to renew the license for any reason OR IS ON EMERITUS STATUS
UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE if the individual:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
complies with each continuing education requirement that the Board sets for this purpose;
and
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, pays to
the Board a reinstatement fee set by the Board.
2–601.
Except as otherwise provided in this title[,]:
(1) a person may not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice
certified public accountancy in the State unless licensed by the Board or qualified for a
practice privilege under § 2–321 of this title; AND
(2) A LICENSEE ON EMERITUS STATUS UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS
TITLE MAY NOT:
(I) PRACTICE, ATTEMPT TO PRACTICE, OR OFFER TO PRACTICE
CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE;
(II) SIGN OR CERTIFY FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, TAX RETURNS,
OR AUDIT REPORTS; OR
(III) PROVIDE ATTESTATION SERVICES.
2–603.
– 3 –

Ch. 404 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and unless authorized under this title
to practice certified public accountancy, a person may not represent to the public, by use of
a title, including “licensed certified public accountant”, “certified public accountant”, “public
accountant”, or “auditor”, by use of the abbreviation “CPA”, by description of services,
methods, or procedures, or otherwise, that the person is authorized to practice certified
public accountancy in the State.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not prohibit:
(1) the description of a principal, officer, or employee of an organization by
the position, title, or office that the individual holds in the organization; [or]
(2) THE DESCRIPTION OF A LICENSEE WHO IS ON EMERITUS STATUS
UNDER § 2–313.1 OF THIS TITLE, PROVIDED THAT THE LICENSEE DOES NOT
REPRESENT TO THE PUBLIC THAT THE LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE; OR
[(2)] (3) a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation that
holds a permit or is exempt from the permit requirement under § 2–401 of this title from
using, in connection with the name of the partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, any of the terms or the abbreviation to which subsection (a) of this section
refers.
(c) (1) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE display, distribution, or other use by a person of the person’s name, in
conjunction with any of the following list of titles or abbreviations in a card, sign,
advertisement, directory listing, or other instrument or device, is, in any proceeding under
this title, prima facie evidence that the person represents to the public that the person is
authorized to practice certified public accountancy:
[(i)] 1. “licensed certified public accountant”;
[(ii)] 2. “certified public accountant”;
[(iii)] 3. “public accountant”;
[(iv)] 4. “auditor”; or
[(v)] 5. an abbreviation of any of these titles.
(II) A LICENSEE WHO IS ON EMERITUS STATUS UNDER § 2–313.1
OF THIS TITLE MAY USE THE WORDS “CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT EMERITUS”
OR THE ABBREVIATION “CPA EMERITUS” TO DESCRIBE THE OCCUPATION OF THE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 404
INDIVIDUAL, PROVIDED THAT THE LICENSEE DOES NOT REPRESENT TO THE PUBLIC
THAT THE LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANCY IN THE STATE.
(2) In a proceeding under this title, evidence of a single representation
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is, without evidence of a general course of
conduct, adequate to justify a finding that a person has represented to the public that the
person is authorized to practice certified public accountancy in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –